Utah statutes.
58-60-117.   Externship licenses.

(1)  The division shall issue a temporary license under Part 2, Social Worker Licensing Act, Part 3, Marriage and Family Therapist Licensing Act, or Part 4, Clinical Mental Health Counselor Licensing Act, of this chapter to a person who:

(a)  submits an application for licensure under Part 2, Social Worker Licensing Act, Part 3, Marriage and Family Therapist Licensing Act, or Part 4, Clinical Mental Health Counselor Licensing Act;

(b)  pays a fee determined by the department under Section 63J-1-504;

(c)  holds an earned doctoral degree or master's degree in a discipline that is a prerequisite for practice as a mental health therapist;

(d)  has one or more deficiencies in course work, experience, or training;

(e)  provides mental health therapy as an employee of a public or private organization, which provides mental health therapy, while under the supervision of a person licensed under this chapter; and

(f)  is of good moral character and has no disciplinary action pending or in effect against the applicant in connection with the practice of mental health therapy, in any jurisdiction.

(2)  A temporary license issued under this section shall expire upon the earlier of:

(a)  issuance of the license applied for; or

(b)  three years from the date the temporary license was issued.

(3)  The temporary license issued under this section is an externship license.

